Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-105
Preceding sections; application.

The provisions of sections 48-101 to 48-103 shall apply to any claim for the death of an employee arising under sections 30-809 and 30-810 concerning death by wrongful act.

Laws 1913, c. 198, § 5, p. 580;

R.S.1913, § 3646;

C.S.1922, § 3028;

C.S.1929, § 48-105;

R.S.1943, § 48-105;

Laws 1971, LB 572, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 1.